apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
  <pardef n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ਰਨੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਕੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਏ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
 

    <e lm="ਕਰ"><i>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
